Illinois, session 104th, SB2400.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospice Program Licensing Act is amended by 5adding Section 16 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 60/16 new)7    Sec. 16. Data collection and reporting. 8    (a) The Department shall develop and implement a 9standardized system for collecting data from hospice providers 10across the State.11    (b) The data collected shall include, but not be limited 12to:13        (1) Demographic information of hospice patients, 14    including age, race, gender, and geographic location.15        (2) Service utilization metrics, such as average 16    length of stay in hospice care and types of services 17    provided.18        (3) Patient and family satisfaction data, collected 19    through voluntary surveys.20        (4) Workforce data, including the availability and 21    turnover rates of hospice staff.22    (c) Data shall be collected in compliance with all 23applicable federal and State privacy laws, including the   SB2400- 2 -LRB104 10977 BAB 21059 b1Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), 2to protect patient and provider confidentiality.3    (d) The Department shall compile an annual report 4summarizing key findings from the collected data. The report 5shall include:6        (1) trends in hospice service utilization and quality;7        (2) geographic and demographic disparities in access 8    to care; and9        (3) recommendations for addressing identified gaps or 10    challenges.11    (e) The annual report shall be submitted to the Governor 12and the General Assembly and made publicly available on the 13Department's website.